Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2928HV (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 1009 Section 1. Section 298.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. To pay the costs of operating and 3 licensing school safety and security infrastructure, including 4 weapons detection systems and door monitoring systems. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. To pay the costs of employing, or 6 retaining the services of, any of the following: 7 (1) A school resource officer as defined in 34 U.S.C. 8 Â§10389. 9 (2) An individual employed by a private security business, 10 as defined in section 80A.1, who possesses a permit to carry 11 weapons issued under section 724.6. 12 (3) A reserve peace officer as defined in section 80D.1A. 13 (4) A peace officer as defined in section 801.4. 14 (5) An individual who has at least two years of experience 15 in law enforcement or security and who will provide 16 professional security services. 17 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 18 years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. 19